Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1687 N 1
SFX 1687 0 saving .

SFX 1688 N 1
SFX 1688 0 sbaum .

SFX 1689 N 1
SFX 1689 0 scala .

SFX 1690 N 1
SFX 1690 0 scale .

SFX 1691 N 1
SFX 1691 0 science .

SFX 1692 N 1
SFX 1692 0 scope .

SFX 1693 N 1
SFX 1693 0 scribed .

SFX 1694 N 1
SFX 1694 0 scription .

SFX 1695 N 1
SFX 1695 0 sdorp .

SFX 1696 N 1
SFX 1696 0 se .

SFX 1697 N 1
SFX 1697 0 security .

SFX 1698 N 1
SFX 1698 0 sed .

SFX 1699 N 1
SFX 1699 0 seed .

SFX 1700 N 1
SFX 1700 0 selene .

SFX 1701 N 1
SFX 1701 0 sensory .

SFX 1702 N 1
SFX 1702 0 servatism .

SFX 1703 N 1
SFX 1703 0 service .

SFX 1704 N 1
SFX 1704 0 ses .

SFX 1705 N 1
SFX 1705 0 sex .

SFX 1706 N 1
SFX 1706 0 sh .

SFX 1707 N 1
SFX 1707 0 shability .

SFX 1708 N 1
SFX 1708 0 shable .

SFX 1709 N 1
SFX 1709 0 shableness .

SFX 1710 N 1
SFX 1710 0 shah .

SFX 1711 N 1
SFX 1711 0 shan .

SFX 1712 N 1
SFX 1712 0 share .

SFX 1713 N 1
SFX 1713 0 shares .

SFX 1714 N 1
SFX 1714 0 shi .

SFX 1715 N 1
SFX 1715 0 ship .

SFX 1716 N 1
SFX 1716 0 ships .

SFX 1717 N 1
SFX 1717 0 shu .

SFX 1718 N 1
SFX 1718 0 shui .

SFX 1719 N 1
SFX 1719 0 shya .

SFX 1720 N 1
SFX 1720 0 si .

SFX 1721 N 1
SFX 1721 0 siewicz .

SFX 1722 N 1
SFX 1722 0 signate .

SFX 1723 N 1
SFX 1723 0 signated .

SFX 1724 N 1
SFX 1724 0 signating .

SFX 1725 N 1
SFX 1725 0 signation .

SFX 1726 N 1
SFX 1726 0 sin .

SFX 1727 N 1
SFX 1727 0 sing .

SFX 1728 N 1
SFX 1728 0 sion .

SFX 1729 N 1
SFX 1729 0 sions .

SFX 1730 N 1
SFX 1730 0 sis .

SFX 1731 N 1
SFX 1731 0 sit .

SFX 1732 N 1
SFX 1732 0 siting .

SFX 1733 N 1
SFX 1733 0 sk .

SFX 1734 N 1
SFX 1734 0 skie .

SFX 1735 N 1
SFX 1735 0 sko .

SFX 1736 N 1
SFX 1736 0 sky .

SFX 1737 N 1
SFX 1737 0 sm .

SFX 1738 N 1
SFX 1738 0 sman .

SFX 1739 N 1
SFX 1739 0 some .

SFX 1740 N 1
SFX 1740 0 someness .

SFX 1741 N 1
SFX 1741 0 somes .

SFX 1742 N 1
SFX 1742 0 sorium .

SFX 1743 N 1
SFX 1743 0 spar .

SFX 1744 N 1
SFX 1744 0 spars .

SFX 1745 N 1
SFX 1745 0 spasm .

SFX 1746 N 1
SFX 1746 0 spectral .

SFX 1747 N 1
SFX 1747 0 sperm .

SFX 1748 N 1
SFX 1748 0 sport .

SFX 1749 N 1
SFX 1749 0 ssage .

SFX 1750 N 1
SFX 1750 0 ssemblies .

SFX 1751 N 1
SFX 1751 0 ssembly .

SFX 1752 N 1
SFX 1752 0 ssodactyl .

SFX 1753 N 1
SFX 1753 0 ssodactyls .

SFX 1754 N 1
SFX 1754 0 st .

SFX 1755 N 1
SFX 1755 0 stakeholder .

SFX 1756 N 1
SFX 1756 0 sted .

SFX 1757 N 1
SFX 1757 0 step .

SFX 1758 N 1
SFX 1758 0 ster .

SFX 1759 N 1
SFX 1759 0 sthesia .

SFX 1760 N 1
SFX 1760 0 sthesias .

SFX 1761 N 1
SFX 1761 0 sthetes .

SFX 1762 N 1
SFX 1762 0 sthetic .

SFX 1763 N 1
SFX 1763 0 stick .

SFX 1764 N 1
SFX 1764 0 stilbesterol .

SFX 1765 N 1
SFX 1765 0 stilbestrol .

SFX 1766 N 1
SFX 1766 0 stilbestrols .

SFX 1767 N 1
SFX 1767 0 stilboestrol .

SFX 1768 N 1
SFX 1768 0 stle .

SFX 1769 N 1
SFX 1769 0 stles .

SFX 1770 N 1
SFX 1770 0 stoker .

SFX 1771 N 1
SFX 1771 0 stone .

SFX 1772 N 1
SFX 1772 0 stones .

SFX 1773 N 1
SFX 1773 0 storey .

SFX 1774 N 1
SFX 1774 0 storied .

SFX 1775 N 1
SFX 1775 0 strature .

SFX 1776 N 1
SFX 1776 0 striatum .

SFX 1777 N 1
SFX 1777 0 structure .

SFX 1778 N 1
SFX 1778 0 structured .

SFX 1779 N 1
SFX 1779 0 structures .

SFX 1780 N 1
SFX 1780 0 sts .

SFX 1781 N 1
SFX 1781 0 su .

SFX 1782 N 1
SFX 1782 0 sus .

SFX 1783 N 1
SFX 1783 0 system .

SFX 1784 N 1
SFX 1784 0 systems .

SFX 1785 N 1
SFX 1785 0 t .

SFX 1786 N 1
SFX 1786 0 ta .

SFX 1787 N 1
SFX 1787 0 tac .

SFX 1788 N 1
SFX 1788 0 taceous .

SFX 1789 N 1
SFX 1789 0 tage .

SFX 1790 N 1
SFX 1790 0 tages .

SFX 1791 N 1
SFX 1791 0 tate .

SFX 1792 N 1
SFX 1792 0 tates .

SFX 1793 N 1
SFX 1793 0 taxis .

SFX 1794 N 1
SFX 1794 0 te .

SFX 1795 N 1
SFX 1795 0 tech .

SFX 1796 N 1
SFX 1796 0 ted .

SFX 1797 N 1
SFX 1797 0 teid .

SFX 1798 N 1
SFX 1798 0 tel .

SFX 1799 N 1
SFX 1799 0 tely .

SFX 1800 N 1
SFX 1800 0 tement .

SFX 1801 N 1
SFX 1801 0 tements .

SFX 1802 N 1
SFX 1802 0 temporal .

SFX 1803 N 1
SFX 1803 0 tence .

SFX 1804 N 1
SFX 1804 0 tences .

SFX 1805 N 1
SFX 1805 0 tencies .

SFX 1806 N 1
SFX 1806 0 tency .

SFX 1807 N 1
SFX 1807 0 teness .

SFX 1808 N 1
SFX 1808 0 tenesses .

SFX 1809 N 1
SFX 1809 0 tenga .

SFX 1810 N 1
SFX 1810 0 ter .

SFX 1811 N 1
SFX 1811 0 tered .

SFX 1812 N 1
SFX 1812 0 tering .

SFX 1813 N 1
SFX 1813 0 termination .

SFX 1814 N 1
SFX 1814 0 terminations .

SFX 1815 N 1
SFX 1815 0 ters .

SFX 1816 N 1
SFX 1816 0 tes .

SFX 1817 N 1
SFX 1817 0 teship .

SFX 1818 N 1
SFX 1818 0 teships .

SFX 1819 N 1
SFX 1819 0 tetracycline .

SFX 1820 N 1
SFX 1820 0 th .

SFX 1821 N 1
SFX 1821 0 tha .

SFX 1822 N 1
SFX 1822 0 therian .

SFX 1823 N 1
SFX 1823 0 thering .

SFX 1824 N 1
SFX 1824 0 therings .

SFX 1825 N 1
SFX 1825 0 thimide .

SFX 1826 N 1
SFX 1826 0 thiouracil .

SFX 1827 N 1
SFX 1827 0 thoracic .

SFX 1828 N 1
SFX 1828 0 thorised .

SFX 1829 N 1
SFX 1829 0 threaded .

SFX 1830 N 1
SFX 1830 0 threading .

SFX 1831 N 1
SFX 1831 0 ti .

SFX 1832 N 1
SFX 1832 0 tial .

SFX 1833 N 1
SFX 1833 0 tic .

SFX 1834 N 1
SFX 1834 0 tics .

SFX 1835 N 1
SFX 1835 0 tid .

SFX 1836 N 1
SFX 1836 0 ties .

SFX 1837 N 1
SFX 1837 0 tifid .

SFX 1838 N 1
SFX 1838 0 ting .

SFX 1839 N 1
SFX 1839 0 tion .

SFX 1840 N 1
SFX 1840 0 tional .

SFX 1841 N 1
SFX 1841 0 tions .

SFX 1842 N 1
SFX 1842 0 tiped .

SFX 1843 N 1
SFX 1843 0 tis .

SFX 1844 N 1
SFX 1844 0 tisect .

SFX 1845 N 1
SFX 1845 0 tism .

SFX 1846 N 1
SFX 1846 0 tistic .

SFX 1847 N 1
SFX 1847 0 tium .

SFX 1848 N 1
SFX 1848 0 tiums .

SFX 1849 N 1
SFX 1849 0 tive .

SFX 1850 N 1
SFX 1850 0 tiveness .

SFX 1851 N 1
SFX 1851 0 tivenesses .

SFX 1852 N 1
SFX 1852 0 tize .

SFX 1853 N 1
SFX 1853 0 tlebush .

SFX 1854 N 1
SFX 1854 0 tlebushes .

SFX 1855 N 1
SFX 1855 0 tlike .

SFX 1856 N 1
SFX 1856 0 to .

SFX 1857 N 1
SFX 1857 0 toe .

SFX 1858 N 1
SFX 1858 0 toed .

SFX 1859 N 1
SFX 1859 0 toeing .

SFX 1860 N 1
SFX 1860 0 toes .

SFX 1861 N 1
SFX 1861 0 toglyphic .

SFX 1862 N 1
SFX 1862 0 toglyphics .

SFX 1863 N 1
SFX 1863 0 toin .

SFX 1864 N 1
SFX 1864 0 tolatry .

SFX 1865 N 1
SFX 1865 0 tologic .

SFX 1866 N 1
SFX 1866 0 tologies .

SFX 1867 N 1
SFX 1867 0 tologist .

SFX 1868 N 1
SFX 1868 0 tology .

SFX 1869 N 1
SFX 1869 0 toloxamine .

SFX 1870 N 1
SFX 1870 0 tome .

SFX 1871 N 1
SFX 1871 0 tomes .

SFX 1872 N 1
SFX 1872 0 tomycosis .

SFX 1873 N 1
SFX 1873 0 tomyositis .

SFX 1874 N 1
SFX 1874 0 too .

SFX 1875 N 1
SFX 1875 0 tophytosis .

SFX 1876 N 1
SFX 1876 0 tor .

SFX 1877 N 1
SFX 1877 0 tos .

SFX 1878 N 1
SFX 1878 0 tosclerosis .

SFX 1879 N 1
SFX 1879 0 tose .

SFX 1880 N 1
SFX 1880 0 tosis .

SFX 1881 N 1
SFX 1881 0 touch .

SFX 1882 N 1
SFX 1882 0 tous .

SFX 1883 N 1
SFX 1883 0 track .

SFX 1884 N 1
SFX 1884 0 transferase .

SFX 1885 N 1
SFX 1885 0 tre .

SFX 1886 N 1
SFX 1886 0 tres .

SFX 1887 N 1
SFX 1887 0 trillion .

SFX 1888 N 1
SFX 1888 0 trocento .

SFX 1889 N 1
SFX 1889 0 trocentos .

SFX 1890 N 1
SFX 1890 0 tronic .

SFX 1891 N 1
SFX 1891 0 tronics .

SFX 1892 N 1
SFX 1892 0 try .

SFX 1893 N 1
SFX 1893 0 ts .

SFX 1894 N 1
SFX 1894 0 ttcher .

SFX 1895 N 1
SFX 1895 0 tted .

SFX 1896 N 1
SFX 1896 0 tting .

SFX 1897 N 1
SFX 1897 0 ttlehold .

SFX 1898 N 1
SFX 1898 0 ttleholds .

SFX 1899 N 1
SFX 1899 0 tube .

SFX 1900 N 1
SFX 1900 0 tuberculate .

SFX 1901 N 1
SFX 1901 0 tubes .

SFX 1902 N 1
SFX 1902 0 tudinousness .

SFX 1903 N 1
SFX 1903 0 tudinousnesses .

SFX 1904 N 1
SFX 1904 0 tural .

SFX 1905 N 1
SFX 1905 0 ture .

SFX 1906 N 1
SFX 1906 0 tures .

SFX 1907 N 1
SFX 1907 0 ty .

SFX 1908 N 1
SFX 1908 0 typal .

SFX 1909 N 1
SFX 1909 0 typic .

SFX 1910 N 1
SFX 1910 0 u .

SFX 1911 N 1
SFX 1911 0 ual .

SFX 1912 N 1
SFX 1912 0 ualise .

SFX 1913 N 1
SFX 1913 0 ualize .

SFX 1914 N 1
SFX 1914 0 ualized .

SFX 1915 N 1
SFX 1915 0 ualizes .

SFX 1916 N 1
SFX 1916 0 ualizing .

SFX 1917 N 1
SFX 1917 0 uard .

SFX 1918 N 1
SFX 1918 0 uary .

SFX 1919 N 1
SFX 1919 0 ud .

SFX 1920 N 1
SFX 1920 0 uddin .

SFX 1921 N 1
SFX 1921 0 ues .

SFX 1922 N 1
SFX 1922 0 uia .

SFX 1923 N 1
SFX 1923 0 ukh .
