Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
accompli/1708
acicula/1590,1682,1794
acousma/1833
aculea/1794,1796
adenocarcinoma/1682,1882
agio/1682,1789,1790
alkane/1682,1785,1893
alveoli/1843
angioma/1682,1882
anthropophagi/1794,1816
areola/1590,1682,1794
ascoma/1786
atheroma/1682,1833,1882
babas/1781,1782
bacca/1682,1794
bandelet/1682,1794
barbet/1682,1794,1816
benne/1682,1785,1893
benni/557,646,1682,1699
bialy/1770
Boe/1894
boneset/1682,1810,1815
Borgo/1910
breccia/1682,1794,1796,1816,1838
bregma/1786,1833
brit/1682,1785,1853,1854,1893
Buch/1688
buret/1794,1816
calyptra/1682,1794
camas/646,773,1682,1704
camo/1706
campanula/1590,1682,1794,1796
carburet/565,1682,1796,1838
caruncula/1590,1794,1796
casque/1682,1785,1798
castra/1831
cauda/1786,1794,1796,1816
ceras/1816
chela/1682,1794,1796,1816,1838,1839,1841
chokies/1785
cingula/1794
commix/565,646,882,1905,1906
complot/1682,1796,1838
concerti/1696
congo/646,1682,1910,1941
copartner/1682,1715,1716
coquet/1682,1796,1838
cosies/1785
costia/1730
councillor/1682,1715,1716
counsellor/1682,1715,1716
counterplot/1682,1796,1838
crania/1794,1816
crus/646,1788,1855,1879
curet/1682,1794,1800,1801,1816
curvet/1682,1796,1838
cyma/1682,1847,1848
cytokine/1682,1730,1833
decora/1850,1851
desex/565,646,882,1912,1913,1914,1915,1916
dicamptodon/1835
distrain/565,882,1682,1785,1893
draughtsman/1715
Edo/1917
Elis/1786
englut/1682,1796,1838
figura/1794
fimbria/1794,1796
funiculi/1843
gastrula/1682,1839,1841
giardia/1682,1730
gramma/1682,1833,1864
granuloma/1682,1882
gravida/1682,1839
indri/1682,1704
inga/1823,1824
intermit/1682,1796,1803,1804,1805,1806,1838
intersex/1911
jihadi/1754,1780
kerb/1682,1771,1772
Kerman/1710
Kruger/1695
kumis/1704
lansa/1785
lazaret/1682,1794,1816,1856,1877
Lika/1720
lipoma/1682,1880
Luka/1721
mandibula/1794
Marsa/1689,1998
Mazur/1734
metre/1682,1763
millime/1682,1885,1886
monilia/1682,1704,1730
Mykolayiv/1733
mylodon/1682,1835
neocon/1702
neurofibroma/1880
neuroma/1882
nitrofuran/1863
oculi/1737
oesophagi/1843
oxime/1682,1810,1815
petri/1749
phyle/1682,1833
planchet/1682,1794,1816
plica/557,1794,1839,1841
posteriori/1836,1907
poulet/1794
precentor/1682,1715,1716
propyl/1682,1826
protea/1682,1704,1739,1741
purpura/1682,1794
pyrola/1682,1892
Sanma/1809
satinet/1794
scholia/1754
scotoma/1882
semicoma/1682,1879
Serre/1785
sonsie/1590,1754
spatio/1802
standpat/1810
stemma/1833,1834,1868
submedian/1785,1893
succus/1682,1704,1728,1729
temporal/913,935,943,1836,1907
thermoset/1838
ticktack/565,882,1682,1874
tippy/1857,1858,1859,1860
Torba/1785
trabecula/1794
trachodon/1785
trainband/1738
tungs/1791,1792
tunica/557,1794,1816
turaco/1682,1910,1941
Tver/1736
Uma/1787
umteen/1820
unau/1682,1828
usufruct/1918
vaccina/1876
voivode/1682,1716
xanthoma/1682,1880
zygoma/1682,1833
